Nevada, session 83, SB226.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 218D.160 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
218D.160 1. The Chair of the Legislative Commission may
request the drafting of not more than 10 legislative measures before
the first day of a regular session, with the approval of the Legislative
Commission, which relate to the affairs of the Legislature or its
employees, including legislative measures requested by the
legislative staff.
2. The Chair of the Interim Finance Committee may request
the drafting of not more than 10 legislative measures before the first
day of a regular session, with the approval of the Committee, which
relate to matters within the scope of the Committee.
3. Except as otherwise provided by a specific statute, joint rule
or concurrent resolution:
(a) [Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (b), (c) and (d),
a] A Joint Interim Standing Committee may request the drafting of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
not more than 10 legislative measures which relate to matters within
the scope of the Committee [.
(b) The] , unless another provision in this subsection
authorizes a different number of requests for a specific Joint
Interim Standing Committee.
(b) In addition to the number of requests authorized pursuant
to paragraph (a), the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health
and Human Services may request the drafting of not more than [15]
5 legislative measures [which relate to matters within the scope of
the Committee, at least 5 of which must relate to matters] relating to
child welfare.
(c) [The] In addition to the number of requests authorized
pursuant to paragraph (a), the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on the Judiciary may request the drafting of not more than [15] 5
legislative measures [which relate to matters within the scope of the
Committee, at least 5 of which must relate to matters] relating to
juvenile justice.
(d) [The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Natural
Resources may request the drafting of not more than 14 legislative
measures which relate to matters within the scope of the Committee,
at least 4 of which must relate to matters relating to public lands
based on the recommendations for legislation submitted by the
Subcommittee on Public Lands pursuant to NRS 218E.525.
(e)] Any legislative committee created by a statute, other than
the Legislative Committee on Senior Citizens, Veterans and Adults
With Special Needs created by NRS 218E.750 , the Sunset
Committee of the Legislature created by NRS 232B.210, the
Committee on Public Lands created by NRS 218E.510 or an
interim legislative committee, may request the drafting of not more
than 10 legislative measures which relate to matters within the scope
of the committee.
[(f)] (e) The Legislative Committee on Senior Citizens,
Veterans and Adults With Special Needs created by NRS 218E.750
may request the drafting of not more than 6 legislative measures
which relate to matters within the scope of the Committee.
[(g)] (f) The Sunset Committee of the Legislature created by
NRS 232B.210 may request the drafting of not more than 5
legislative measures which relate to matters within the scope of the
Committee, except that the Committee may request the drafting of
additional legislative measures if the Legislative Commission
approves each additional request by a majority vote.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
(g) The Committee on Public Lands created by NRS 218E.510
may request the drafting of not more than 4 legislative measures
which relate to matters within the scope of the Committee.
(h) Any committee or subcommittee established by an order of
the Legislative Commission pursuant to NRS 218E.200 may request
the drafting of not more than 5 legislative measures which relate to
matters within the scope of the study or investigation, except that
such a committee or subcommittee may request the drafting of
additional legislative measures if the Legislative Commission
approves each additional request by a majority vote.
[(h)] (i) Any other committee established by the Legislature
which conducts an interim legislative study or investigation may
request the drafting of not more than 5 legislative measures which
relate to matters within the scope of the study or investigation.
 The requests authorized pursuant to this subsection must be
submitted to the Legislative Counsel on or before September 1
preceding a regular session unless the Legislative Commission
authorizes submitting a request after that date.
4. Each request made pursuant to this section must be on a
form prescribed by the Legislative Counsel.
Sec. 2. NRS 218E.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.110 1. “Committee” means the Legislative
Commission, a Joint Interim Standing Committee , the Sunset
Committee of the Legislature created by NRS 232B.210 and any
other legislative committee or subcommittee created by the
provisions of this chapter or a specific statute, concurrent resolution
or order of the Legislative Commission to conduct studies or
investigations or perform any other legislative business during the
legislative interim.
2. The term includes, without limitation, any interim,
advisory or other similar committee or subcommittee for which
legislative staff members serve as the primary administrative or
professional staff.
3. The term does not include any legislative committee or
subcommittee appointed by the Legislature or either House to
conduct or perform legislative business during a regular or special
session, including, without limitation, any joint, standing,
temporary, special or select committee or committee of the whole.
Sec. 3. NRS 218E.125 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.125 1. The provisions of NRS 218E.105 to 218E.140,
inclusive, are intended to supplement the other provisions of this
chapter and any other [law] laws or rules governing the legislative
proceedings of a committee, including, without limitation, any
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
applicable principles of parliamentary law, and the provisions of
NRS 218E.105 to 218E.140, inclusive, do not limit the application
of such other [provisions.] legal authorities.
2. The powers, privileges and immunities granted by the
provisions of NRS 218E.105 to 218E.140, inclusive, are in addition
to any other powers, privileges and immunities recognized by [law,]
any other laws or rules, including, without limitation, any
applicable principles of parliamentary law, and all such powers,
privileges and immunities are cumulative, so that the application or
attempted application of any one does not bar the application or
attempted application of any other.
Sec. 4. NRS 218E.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.130 1. A committee may conduct investigations and
hold hearings regarding any matter which is pertinent to its
legislative business or possible future legislative action and may
exercise any of the investigative powers set forth in NRS 218E.105
to 218E.140, inclusive.
2. The secretary of the committee or any member of the
committee may administer oaths to witnesses who appear before the
committee.
3. The chair of the committee, or the secretary of the
committee on behalf of the chair, may cause the deposition of
witnesses to be taken, whether the witnesses reside within or
without the State, in the manner prescribed by court rules for taking
depositions in civil actions in the district court.
4. The chair of the committee may take, direct or require any
necessary and reasonable actions to carry out the committee’s
management, government, budget, meetings and proceedings,
subject to the laws and rules governing the committee, including,
without limitation, any applicable principles of parliamentary law.
5. If a vacancy occurs in the position of chair of the
committee, or if the chair is prohibited or disqualified from
participating or acting on a particular matter for any reason or is
absent, disabled or otherwise unavailable or unable to carry out
the position for any reason, the vice chair of the committee shall
serve as the acting chair, with all the powers, privileges and
immunities of the position of chair, until the vacancy is filled or
the chair is eligible, available or able to carry out the position
again, as applicable.
Sec. 5. NRS 218E.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.320 1. There are hereby created the following Joint
Interim Standing Committees of the Legislature:
(a) Commerce and Labor;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(b) Education;
(c) Government Affairs;
(d) Growth and Infrastructure;
(e) Health and Human Services;
(f) Judiciary;
(g) Legislative Operations and Elections;
(h) Natural Resources; and
(i) Revenue.
2. Each Joint Interim Standing Committee consists of eight
regular members and five alternate members. As soon as is
practicable after the adjournment of each regular session [:] and not
later than October 31 immediately following such adjournment:
(a) The Speaker of the Assembly shall appoint three members of
the Assembly as regular members of each Committee and two
members of the Assembly as alternate members of each Committee.
(b) The Minority Leader of the Assembly shall appoint two
members of the Assembly as regular members of each Committee
and one member of the Assembly as an alternate member of each
Committee.
(c) The Majority Leader of the Senate shall appoint two
Senators as regular members of each Committee and one Senator as
an alternate member of each Committee.
(d) The Minority Leader of the Senate shall appoint one Senator
as a regular member of each Committee and one Senator as an
alternate member of each Committee.
3. Before making their respective appointments, the Speaker of
the Assembly, the Majority Leader of the Senate and the Minority
Leaders of the Senate and Assembly shall consult so that, to the
extent practicable:
(a) At least five of the regular members appointed to each Joint
Interim Standing Committee served on the corresponding standing
committee or committees during the preceding regular session.
(b) Not more than five of the regular members appointed to each
Joint Interim Standing Committee are members of the same political
party.
4. The Legislative Commission shall [select] appoint the Chair
and Vice Chair of each Joint Interim Standing Committee from
among the members of the Committee [.] and shall make such
appointments as soon as is practicable after the adjournment of
each regular session and not later than October 31 immediately
following such adjournment. The Chair must be appointed from
one House of the Legislature and the Vice Chair from the other
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
House. The position of Chair must alternate each biennium between
the Houses of the Legislature. [Each of those officers]
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section, each Chair
and Vice Chair holds the position , while qualified, until a
successor is appointed after the next regular session. If a vacancy
occurs in the position of Chair or Vice Chair, the vacancy must be
filled in the same manner as the original [selection] appointment for
the remainder of the unexpired term.
[5.] 6. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a
member of a Joint Interim Standing Committee holds his or her
membership on the Committee, while qualified, until a successor
is appointed after the next regular session. The membership of any
member of a Joint Interim Standing Committee who does not
become a candidate for reelection or who is defeated for reelection
terminates on the day next after the general election. The Speaker
designate of the Assembly or the Majority Leader designate of the
Senate, as the case may be, may appoint a member to fill the
vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.
[6.] 7. Vacancies on a Joint Interim Standing Committee must
be filled in the same manner as original appointments.
Sec. 6. NRS 218E.325 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.325 1. Except as otherwise ordered by the Legislative
Commission, the members of a Joint Interim Standing Committee
shall meet not earlier than November 1 of each odd-numbered year
and not later than August 31 of the following even-numbered year at
the times and places specified by a call of the Chair or a majority of
the Committee.
2. The Director or his or her designee shall act as the nonvoting
recording Secretary of each Joint Interim Standing Committee.
3. Five members of a Joint Interim Standing Committee
constitute a quorum, and a quorum may exercise all the power and
authority conferred on the Committee, except that any
recommended legislation proposed by [a] the Committee must be
approved by a majority of the members of the Senate and a majority
of the members of the Assembly serving on the Committee.
4. All requests for the drafting of recommended legislation
approved by a Joint Interim Standing Committee must be made in
accordance with NRS 218D.160.
5. If an alternate member of a Joint Interim Standing
Committee attends a meeting of the Committee in place of a
regular member who cannot attend the meeting, the alternate
member who attends the meeting must be of the same political
party as the regular member. When acting in place of a regular
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
member, an alternate member has all the powers, privileges and
immunities of a regular member.
6. Except during a regular or special session, for each day or
portion of a day during which a member of a Joint Interim Standing
Committee attends a meeting of the Committee or is otherwise
engaged in the work of the Committee, the member is entitled to
receive the:
(a) Compensation provided for a majority of the members of the
Legislature during the first 60 days of the preceding regular session;
(b) Per diem allowance provided for state officers and
employees generally; and
(c) Travel expenses provided pursuant to NRS 218A.655.
[]
7. The compensation, per diem allowances and travel expenses
of the members of a Joint Interim Standing Committee must be
paid from the Legislative Fund.
Sec. 7. NRS 218E.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.330 1. A Joint Interim Standing Committee may:
(a) Evaluate and review issues within the jurisdiction of the
corresponding standing committee or committees from the
preceding regular session;
(b) Exercise any of the investigative powers set forth in NRS
218E.105 to 218E.140, inclusive; and
(c) Within the limits of the Committee’s budget, conduct studies
directed by the Legislature or the Legislative Commission.
2. In addition to the authorized scope of issues set forth in
paragraph (a) of subsection 1:
(a) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human
Services shall, either as part of its regular work or through
appointment of a subcommittee, evaluate and review issues relating
to child welfare.
(b) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on the Judiciary shall,
either as part of its regular work or through appointment of a
subcommittee, evaluate and review issues relating to juvenile
justice.
(c) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on [Legislative
Operations and Elections] Government Affairs may evaluate and
review issues relating to governmental purchasing, including,
without limitation, recommendations submitted to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee by the Commission to Study Governmental
Purchasing pursuant to NRS 332.215.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
3. The Legislative Commission shall review and approve the
budget and work program of each Joint Interim Standing Committee
and any changes to the budget or work program.
4. A Joint Interim Standing Committee shall prepare a
comprehensive report of the Committee’s activities in the interim
and its findings and any recommendations for proposed legislation.
The report must be submitted to the Director for distribution to the
next regular session.
Sec. 8. NRS 218E.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.500 The Legislature finds and declares that:
1. Policies and issues relating to public lands and state
sovereignty as impaired by federal ownership of land are matters of
continuing concern to this State.
2. This concern necessarily includes an awareness that all
federal statutes, policies and regulations which affect the
management of public lands are likely to have extensive effects
within the State and must not be ignored or automatically dismissed
as beyond the reach of the state’s policymakers.
3. Experience with federal regulations relating to public lands
has demonstrated that the State of Nevada and its citizens are
subjected to regulations which sometimes are unreasonable,
arbitrary, beyond the intent of the Congress or the scope of the
authority of the agency adopting them and that as a result these
regulations should be subjected to legislative review and comment,
and judicially tested where appropriate, to protect the rights and
interests of the State and its citizens.
4. Other western states where public lands comprise a large
proportion of the total area have shown an interest in matters
relating to public lands and those states, along with Nevada, have
been actively participating in cooperative efforts to acquire, evaluate
and share information and promote greater understanding of the
issues. Since Nevada can both contribute to and benefit from such
interstate activities, it is appropriate that [a subcommittee on matters
relating to public lands] the Committee on Public Lands be
assigned primary responsibility for participating in them.
Sec. 8.3. NRS 218E.505 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.505 As used in NRS 218E.500 to 218E.525, inclusive,
unless the context otherwise requires, [“Subcommittee”]
“Committee” means the [Subcommittee] Committee on Public
Lands . [of the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Natural
Resources.]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
Sec. 8.5. NRS 218E.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.510 1. There is hereby created the [Subcommittee]
Committee on Public Lands , [of the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Natural Resources,] consisting of eight members
appointed by the [Chair of the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Natural Resources,] Legislative Commission, who must include:
(a) [Two] Three members of the Senate [who are] of which:
(1) Two members [of] must be selected from the majority
party; and
(2) One member must be selected from the [Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Natural Resources;] minority party;
(b) [Two] Three members of the Assembly [who are] of which:
(1) Two members [of] must be selected from the majority
party; and
(2) One member must be selected from the [Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Natural Resources;] minority party;
(c) One elected officer representing the governing body of a
local political subdivision, appointed with appropriate regard for his
or her experience with and knowledge of matters relating to public
lands; and
(d) One member representing tribal governments in Nevada who
is recommended by the Inter-Tribal Council of Nevada, Inc., or its
successor organization, appointed with appropriate regard for his or
her experience with and knowledge of matters relating to public
lands . [;]
2. The members who are Legislators must be appointed to
provide representation from the various geographical regions of the
State.
3. The [Chair of the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Natural Resources] Legislative Commission shall appoint a Chair of
the [Subcommittee] Committee from one House and a Vice Chair of
the [Subcommittee] Committee from the other House. [Each Chair
and Vice Chair holds office for a term of 2 years commencing on
July 1 of each odd-numbered year. If a vacancy occurs in the office
of Chair or Vice Chair, the vacancy must be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the
unexpired term.]
4. [Any] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a
member of the Committee holds his or her membership on the
Committee, while qualified, until a successor is appointed after the
next regular session. The membership of any member of the
[Subcommittee] Committee described in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of
subsection 1 who [is] does not become a candidate for reelection or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
who is defeated for reelection [continues to serve] terminates on the
day next after the general election . [until the next regular or special
session convenes.
5. Vacancies on] The Legislative Commission may appoint a
member to fill the [Subcommittee must be filled in] vacancy for the
[same manner as original appointments.
6.] remainder of the unexpired term.
5. The Chair of the [Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Natural Resources] Legislative Commission may appoint alternates
for members of the [Subcommittee.] Committee. The Chair of the
[Subcommittee:] Committee:
(a) May designate an alternate appointed by the Chair of the
[Joint Interim Standing Committee on Natural Resources]
Legislative Commission to serve in place of a regular member who
is unable to attend a meeting; and
(b) Shall, for a member who is a Legislator, designate an
alternate appointed by the Chair of the [Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Natural Resources] Legislative Commission who is
[a member] of the [same House and] same political party as the
regular member to serve in place of the regular member if one is
available.
Sec. 8.7. NRS 218E.515 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.515 1. Except as otherwise [ordered by] provided in
this section or the [Legislative Commission, the members of the
Subcommittee shall meet not earlier than November 1 of each odd-
numbered year and not later than August 31 of the following even-
numbered year at the times and places specified by a call of the
Chair of the Subcommittee or a majority] provisions of NRS
218E.500 to 218E.525, inclusive, the [Subcommittee.
2. The Research Director or the Research Director’s designee
shall act as the nonvoting recording Secretary.
3. The Subcommittee shall prescribe rules for its own
management and government.
4.] provisions of NRS 218E.320, 218E.325 and 218E.330:
(a) Apply to the Committee in the same manner as a Joint
Interim Standing Committee, including, without limitation,
providing the Committee with any powers, privileges and
immunities set forth in those provisions; and
(b) Control the Committee’s formation, organization and
operations, including, without limitation, its membership, officers,
management, government, budget, compensation, allowances,
expenses, meetings and proceedings, but the Committee shall not
be deemed a Joint Interim Standing Committee for the purposes of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
the number of requests that it may submit for the drafting of
legislative measures pursuant to NRS 218D.160. If there is a
conflict between the provisions of NRS 218E.320, 218E.325 and
218E.330 and the provisions of a specific statute that applies to the
Committee, the provisions of the specific statute control.
2. A majority of the members of the [Subcommittee]
Committee constitutes a quorum, and a quorum may exercise all the
power and authority conferred on the [Subcommittee.
5.] Committee.
3. Except during a regular or special session, for each day or
portion of a day during which members of the [Subcommittee]
Committee who are Legislators attend a meeting of the
[Subcommittee] Committee or are otherwise engaged in the
business of the [Subcommittee,] Committee, the members are
entitled to receive:
(a) The compensation provided for a majority of the Legislators
during the first 60 days of the preceding regular session;
(b) The per diem allowance provided for state officers and
employees generally; and
(c) The travel expenses provided pursuant to NRS 218A.655.
[6.] 4. All such compensation, per diem allowances and travel
expenses of the members of the [Subcommittee] Committee who are
Legislators must be paid from the Legislative Fund.
[7.] 5. The member of the [Subcommittee] Committee who
represents a local political subdivision is entitled to receive the
subsistence allowances and travel expenses provided by law for his
or her position for each day of attendance at a meeting of the
[Subcommittee] Committee and while engaged in the business of
the [Subcommittee,] Committee, to be paid by the local political
subdivision.
[8.] 6. While engaged in the business of the [Subcommittee,]
Committee, to the extent of legislative appropriation, the member of
the [Subcommittee] Committee who represents tribal governments
is entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses
provided for state officers and employees generally.
Sec. 9. NRS 218E.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.520 1. [The Subcommittee] During each legislative
interim, the Committee on Public Lands shall hold at least three
meetings where the primary physical location for the meeting is:
(a) Located in a different county for each such meeting; and
(b) Not located in Clark County, Washoe County or Carson
City for each such meeting,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
 except that this subsection does not prohibit any additional
physical locations for such a meeting from being located in Clark
County, Washoe County or Carson City and connected to the
primary physical location for the meeting through the use of any
authorized remote-technology system or otherwise prohibit the use
of any authorized remote-technology system for such a meeting.
As used in this subsection, “authorized remote-technology system”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 218A.806.
2. In addition to any other powers or duties, the Committee
may:
(a) Review and comment on any administrative policy, rule or
regulation of the:
(1) Secretary of the Interior which pertains to policy
concerning or management of public lands under the control of the
Federal Government; and
(2) Secretary of Agriculture which pertains to policy
concerning or management of national forests;
(b) Conduct investigations and hold hearings in connection with
its review, including, but not limited to, investigating the effect on
the State, its citizens, political subdivisions, businesses and
industries of those policies, rules, regulations and related laws, and
exercise any of the investigative powers set forth in NRS 218E.105
to 218E.140, inclusive;
(c) Consult with and advise the State Land Use Planning
Agency on matters concerning federal land use, policies and
activities in this State;
(d) Direct the Legislative Counsel Bureau to assist in its
research, investigations, review and comment;
(e) Recommend to the Legislature as a result of its review any
appropriate state legislation or corrective federal legislation;
(f) Advise the Attorney General if it believes that any federal
policy, rule or regulation which it has reviewed encroaches on the
sovereignty respecting land or water or their use which has been
reserved to the State pursuant to the Constitution of the United
States;
(g) Enter into a contract for consulting services for land
planning and any other related activities, including, but not limited
to:
(1) Advising the [Subcommittee] Committee and the State
Land Use Planning Agency concerning the revision of the plans
pursuant to NRS 321.7355;
(2) Assisting local governments in the identification of lands
administered by the Federal Government in this State which are
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
needed for residential or economic development or any other
purpose; and
(3) Assisting local governments in the acquisition of federal
lands in this State;
(h) Apply for any available grants and accept any gifts, grants or
donations to assist the [Subcommittee] Committee in carrying out
its duties; and
(i) Review and comment on any other matter relating to the
preservation, conservation, use, management or disposal of public
lands deemed appropriate by the Chair of the [Subcommittee]
Committee or by a majority of the members of the [Subcommittee.]
Committee.
[2.] 3. Any reference in this section to federal policies, rules,
regulations and related federal laws includes those which are
proposed as well as those which are enacted or adopted.
Sec. 10. NRS 218E.525 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.525 [1. The Subcommittee shall:] In addition to any
other powers or duties, the Committee on Public Lands:
1. Shall:
(a) Actively support the efforts of state and local governments in
the western states regarding public lands and state sovereignty as
impaired by federal ownership of land.
(b) Advance knowledge and understanding in local, regional and
national forums of Nevada’s unique situation with respect to public
lands.
(c) Support legislation that will enhance state and local roles in
the management of public lands and will increase the disposal of
public lands.
[2. The Subcommittee:
(a) Shall review]
(d) Review the programs and activities of:
(1) The Colorado River Commission of Nevada;
(2) All public water authorities, districts and systems in the
State of Nevada, including, without limitation, the Southern Nevada
Water Authority, the Truckee Meadows Water Authority, the Virgin
Valley Water District, the Carson Water Subconservancy District,
the Humboldt River Basin Water Authority and the Truckee-Carson
Irrigation District; and
(3) All other public or private entities with which any county
in the State has an agreement regarding the planning, development
or distribution of water resources, or any combination thereof . [;
(b) Shall submit recommendations for legislation to the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Natural Resources;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
(c) Shall, on or before January 15 of each odd-numbered year,
submit to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Natural
Resources for transmittal to the Legislature a report concerning the
review conducted pursuant to paragraph (a); and
(d)] 2. May review and comment on other issues relating to
water resources in this State, including, without limitation:
[(1)] (a) The laws, regulations and policies regulating the
use, allocation and management of water in this State; and
[(2)] (b) The status of existing information and studies
relating to water use, surface water resources and groundwater
resources in this State.
Sec. 11. NRS 218E.555 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.555 1. There is hereby created the Legislative
Committee for the Review and Oversight of the Tahoe Regional
Planning Agency and the Marlette Lake Water System . [consisting
of three members of the Senate and three members of the Assembly,
appointed by the Legislative Commission with]
2. The Committee consists of eight regular members and five
alternate members who are appointed in the same manner as the
members of a Joint Interim Standing Committee pursuant to NRS
218E.320, except that the members of the Committee must be
appointed, to the extent practicable:
(a) With appropriate regard for their experience with and
knowledge of matters relating to the management of natural
resources [. The members must be appointed to] ; and
(b) To provide representation from the various geographical
regions of the State.
[2. The Legislative Commission shall review and approve the
budget and work program for the Committee and any changes to the
budget or work program.
3. The members of the Committee shall elect a Chair from one
House and a Vice Chair from the other House. Each Chair and Vice
Chair holds office for a term of 2 years commencing on July 1 of
each odd-numbered year.
4. Any member of the Committee who is not a candidate for
reelection or who is defeated for reelection continues to serve after
the general election until the next regular or special session
convenes.
5. Vacancies on the Committee must be filled in the same
manner as original appointments.
6. The Committee shall report annually to the Legislative
Commission concerning its activities and any recommendations.]
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions
of NRS 218E.320, 218E.325 and 218E.330:
(a) Apply to the Committee in the same manner as a Joint
Interim Standing Committee, including, without limitation,
providing the Committee with any powers, privileges and
immunities set forth in those provisions; and
(b) Control the Committee’s formation, organization and
operations, including, without limitation, its membership, officers,
management, government, budget, compensation, allowances,
expenses, meetings and proceedings, but the Committee shall not
be deemed a Joint Interim Standing Committee for the purposes of
the number of requests that it may submit for the drafting of
legislative measures pursuant to NRS 218D.160.
4. If there is a conflict between the provisions of NRS
218E.320, 218E.325 and 218E.330 and the provisions of a specific
statute that applies to the Committee, the provisions of the specific
statute control.
Sec. 12. NRS 218E.750 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218E.750 1. The Legislative Committee on Senior Citizens,
Veterans and Adults With Special Needs [, consisting of six
members,] is hereby created.
2. The [membership of the] Committee consists of [:
(a) Three members of the Senate appointed by the Majority
Leader of the Senate, at least one of whom must be a member of the
minority political party; and
(b) Three members of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker of
the Assembly, at least one of whom must be a member of the
minority political party.
2. The Legislative Commission shall review and approve the
budget and work program for the Committee and any changes to the
budget or work program.
3. The Legislative Commission shall select the Chair and Vice
Chair of the Committee from among the members of the Committee.
After the initial selection, each Chair and Vice Chair holds office for
a term of 2 years commencing on July 1 of each odd-numbered year.
The office of Chair of the Committee must alternate each biennium
between the Houses. If a vacancy occurs in the office of Chair or
Vice Chair, the vacancy must be filled in the same manner as the
original selection for the remainder of the unexpired term.
4. A member of the Committee who is not a candidate for
reelection or who is defeated for reelection continues to serve after
the general election until the next regular or special session
convenes.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
5. A vacancy on the Committee must be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the
unexpired term.] eight regular members and five alternate
members who are appointed in the same manner as the members
of a Joint Interim Standing Committee pursuant to
NRS 218E.320.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions
of NRS 218E.320, 218E.325 and 218E.330:
(a) Apply to the Committee in the same manner as a Joint
Interim Standing Committee, including, without limitation,
providing the Committee with any powers, privileges and
immunities set forth in those provisions; and
(b) Control the Committee’s formation, organization and
operations, including, without limitation, its membership, officers,
management, government, budget, compensation, allowances,
expenses, meetings and proceedings, but the Committee shall not
be deemed a Joint Interim Standing Committee for the purposes of
the number of requests that it may submit for the drafting of
legislative measures pursuant to NRS 218D.160.
4. If there is a conflict between the provisions of NRS
218E.320, 218E.325 and 218E.330 and the provisions of a specific
statute that applies to the Committee, the provisions of the specific
statute control.
Sec. 13. Chapter 218H of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 14 and 15 of this act.
Sec. 14. 1. “Legislative committee” means any committee,
subcommittee, commission or similar body created or authorized
by the Legislature or either House to conduct or perform
legislative business at the direction of or on behalf of the
Legislature or either House.
2. The term includes, without limitation, any interim,
advisory or other committee, subcommittee, commission or similar
body for which legislative staff members serve as the primary
administrative or professional staff.
Sec. 15. “Legislative committee investigative meeting, event
or trip” means any meeting, event or trip that the chair of a
legislative committee authorizes as an official meeting, event or
trip of the committee in order for the members of the committee
and legislative staff members to investigate or otherwise receive
any education or information on matters that are pertinent to the
committee’s legislative business or possible future legislative
action.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
Sec. 16. NRS 218H.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218H.030 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 218H.033 to
218H.110, inclusive, and sections 14 and 15 of this act, have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 17. NRS 218H.045 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218H.045 1. “Educational or informational meeting, event or
trip” means any meeting, event or trip undertaken or attended by a
Legislator [if,] or legislative officer, or any legislative staff member
with the approval of his or her chief administrative supervisor, if
in connection with the meeting, event or trip:
(a) The Legislator , legislative officer or legislative staff
member, or a member of [the Legislator’s] his or her household ,
receives anything of value from a lobbyist to undertake or attend the
meeting, event or trip; and
(b) The Legislator , legislative officer or legislative staff
member provides or receives any education or information on
matters relating to the legislative, administrative or political action
of the Legislator [.] or the Legislative Branch.
2. The term includes, without limitation, any reception,
gathering, conference, convention, discussion, forum, roundtable,
seminar, symposium, speaking engagement or other similar
meeting, event or trip with an educational or informational
component.
3. The term does not include:
(a) A meeting, event or trip undertaken or attended by a
Legislator , legislative officer or legislative staff member, or a
member of [the Legislator’s] his or her household , for personal
reasons or for reasons relating to any professional or occupational
license held by the [Legislator or the member of the Legislator’s
household,] person, unless the [Legislator or the member of the
Legislator’s household] person participates as one of the primary
speakers, instructors or presenters at the meeting, event or trip.
(b) A meeting, event or trip undertaken or attended by a
Legislator , legislative officer or legislative staff member, or a
member of [the Legislator’s] his or her household , if the meeting,
event or trip is undertaken or attended as part of his or her bona fide
employment or service as an employee or independent contractor
and anything of value received by the [Legislator or the member of
the Legislator’s household] person for the meeting, event or trip or
otherwise paid for or reimbursed to the [Legislator or the member of
the Legislator’s household] person as part of his or her bona fide
employment or service as an employee or independent contractor.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
(c) A party, meal, function or other social event to which every
Legislator is invited where educational or informational displays or
materials are available but no formal speech, presentation or other
similar action to educate or inform the Legislators occurs.
(d) A legislative committee investigative meeting, event or trip.
4. For the purposes of this section, “anything of value”
includes, without limitation, any actual expenses for food,
beverages, registration fees, travel or lodging provided or given to
or paid for the benefit of the Legislator , legislative officer or
legislative staff member, or a member of [the Legislator’s] his or
her household , or reimbursement for any such actual expenses paid
by the [Legislator or a member of the Legislator’s household,]
person, if the expenses are incurred on a day during which the
[Legislator or a member of the Legislator’s household] person
undertakes or attends the meeting, event or trip or during which the
[Legislator or a member of the Legislator’s household] person
travels to or from the meeting, event or trip.
5. For the purposes of this section, if a legislative staff
member undertakes or attends a meeting, event or trip that meets
the definition of “educational or informational meeting, event or
trip” set forth in this section, the legislative staff member is not
subject to the Nevada Financial Disclosure Act in NRS 281.5555
to 281.581, inclusive, unless the legislative staff member is a
public officer or candidate or a member of a public officer’s or
candidate’s household for the purposes of that Act.
Sec. 18. NRS 218H.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218H.050 1. “Expenditure” means any of the following acts
by a lobbyist while the Legislature is in a regular or special session:
(a) Any payment, conveyance, transfer, distribution, deposit,
advance, loan, forbearance, subscription, pledge or rendering of
money, services or anything else of value; or
(b) Any contract, agreement, promise or other obligation,
whether or not legally enforceable, to make any such expenditure.
2. The term includes, without limitation:
(a) Anything of value provided for an educational or
informational meeting, event or trip [.] or a legislative committee
investigative meeting, event or trip.
(b) The cost of a party, meal, function or other social event to
which every Legislator is invited.
3. The term does not include:
(a) A prohibited gift.
(b) A lobbyist’s personal expenditures for his or her own food,
beverages, lodging, travel expenses or membership fees or dues.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
Sec. 19. NRS 218H.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218H.060 1. “Gift” means any payment, conveyance,
transfer, distribution, deposit, advance, loan, forbearance,
subscription, pledge or rendering of money, services or anything
else of value, unless consideration of equal or greater value is
received.
2. The term does not include:
(a) Any political contribution of money or services related to a
political campaign.
(b) Any commercially reasonable loan made in the ordinary
course of business.
(c) Anything of value provided for an educational or
informational meeting, event or trip [.] or a legislative committee
investigative meeting, event or trip.
(d) The cost of a party, meal, function or other social event to
which every Legislator is invited, including, without limitation, the
cost of food or beverages provided at the party, meal, function or
other social event. For the purposes of this paragraph, there is a
presumption that every Legislator is invited if the party, meal,
function or other social event is held at any governmental building,
facility or other property or the invitation for or notice of the party,
meal, function or other social event indicates that it is a legislative
event.
(e) Any ceremonial gifts received for a birthday, wedding,
anniversary, holiday or other ceremonial occasion from a donor who
is not a lobbyist.
(f) Anything of value received from a person who is:
(1) Related to the recipient, or to the spouse or domestic
partner of the recipient, by blood, adoption, marriage or domestic
partnership within the third degree of consanguinity or affinity; or
(2) A member of the recipient’s household.
(g) Anything of value received by a person as part of his or her
bona fide employment or service as an employee or independent
contractor or otherwise paid for or reimbursed to the person as part
of his or her bona fide employment or service as an employee or
independent contractor.
Sec. 20. NRS 218H.092 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218H.092 “Member of the [Legislator’s] person’s household”
[means] or “member of his or her household,” or any variation
thereof, means:
1. For a person who is subject to the Nevada Financial
Disclosure Act in NRS 281.5555 to 281.581, inclusive, a member
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
of [the Legislator’s] his or her household for the purposes of that
Act.
2. For any other person, a substantially similar member of
his or her household as if the Nevada Financial Disclosure Act in
NRS 281.5555 to 281.581, inclusive [.] , applied to the person but
only for the limited purposes of this definition.
Sec. 21. NRS 176.0129 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176.0129 1. The Office of Finance shall, on an annual basis,
contract for the services of an independent contractor, in accordance
with the provisions of NRS 333.700, to review sentences imposed in
this State and the practices of the State Board of Parole
Commissioners and project annually the number of persons who
will be:
[1.] (a) In a facility or institution of the Department of
Corrections;
[2.] (b) On probation;
[3.] (c) On parole; and
[4.] (d) Serving a term of residential confinement,
 during the 10 years immediately following the date of the
projection.
2. On or before December 1 of each year, the Office of
Finance shall prepare an annual report of the review and
projections made by the independent contractor pursuant to
subsection 1 and provide the report to:
(a) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on the Judiciary;
and
(b) The Department of Sentencing Policy.
Sec. 22. NRS 193.309 is hereby amended to read as follows:
193.309 1. Each law enforcement agency shall annually
make available to the public and on a monthly basis submit to the
Central Repository a report that includes, without limitation, a
compilation of statistics relating to incidents involving the use of
force that occurred during the immediately preceding calendar year,
or month, as applicable, including, without limitation:
(a) The number of complaints against peace officers employed
by the law enforcement agency relating to the use of force and the
number of such complaints that were substantiated; and
(b) A compilation of statistics relating to incidents involving the
use of force that, for each incident, includes, without limitation, all
information collected by the National Use-of-Force Data Collection
of the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
2. Each law enforcement agency shall submit the report
required pursuant to subsection 1 in a manner approved by the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
Director of the Department of Public Safety and in accordance with
the policies, procedures and definitions of the Department.
3. The Central Repository shall make the use-of-force data
submitted by each law enforcement agency pursuant to subsection 1
available for access by the public on the Internet website of the
Central Repository.
4. The Central Repository may accept gifts, grants and
donations from any source for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of this section.
5. To the extent of legislative appropriation, the Office of the
Attorney General shall:
(a) Review the use-of-force data that is publicly available on the
Internet website of the Central Repository;
(b) Prepare a report containing any conclusions or
recommendations resulting from its review; and
(c) On or before December 1 of each year, submit to the
Governor , the Joint Interim Standing Committee on the Judiciary
and [to] the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Legislature the report prepared pursuant to
paragraph (b).
6. Each law enforcement agency in this State shall participate
in the National Use-of-Force Data Collection of the Federal Bureau
of Investigation.
7. Information collected pursuant to this section must not be
introduced into evidence or otherwise used in any way against a
peace officer during a criminal proceeding.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Central Repository” means the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History.
(b) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(1) The sheriff’s office of a county;
(2) A metropolitan police department;
(3) A police department of an incorporated city;
(4) The Department of Corrections;
(5) The police department for the Nevada System of Higher
Education;
(6) Any political subdivision of this State employing park
rangers to enforce laws within its jurisdiction; or
(7) Any political subdivision of this State which has as its
primary duty the enforcement of law and which employs peace
officers to fulfill its duty.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
Sec. 23. NRS 209.192 is hereby amended to read as follows:
209.192 1. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a
Fund for New Construction of Facilities for Prison Industries as a
capital projects fund. The Director shall deposit in the Fund the
deductions made pursuant to subparagraph (3) of paragraph (a) of
subsection 3 or subparagraph (2) of paragraph (a) of subsection 4 of
NRS 209.463. The money in the Fund must only be expended:
(a) To house new industries or expand existing industries in the
industrial program to provide additional employment of offenders;
(b) To relocate, expand, upgrade or modify an existing industry
in the industrial program to enhance or improve operations or
security or to provide additional employment or training of
offenders;
(c) To purchase or lease equipment to be used for the training of
offenders or in the operations of prison industries;
(d) To pay or fund the operations of prison industries, including,
without limitation, paying the salaries of staff and wages of
offenders if the cash balance in the Fund for Prison Industries is
below the average monthly expenses for the operation of prison
industries;
(e) To advertise and promote the goods produced and services
provided by prison industries; or
(f) For any other purpose authorized by the Legislature.
2. Before money in the Fund may be expended , [:
(a) As described in paragraphs (b) to (e), inclusive, of subsection
1, the Director shall submit a proposal for the expenditure to the
Joint Interim Standing Committee on the Judiciary and the State
Board of Examiners.
(b) For construction,] the Director shall submit a proposal for
the expenditure to the State Board of Examiners.
3. Upon making a determination that the proposed expenditure
is appropriate and necessary, the State Board of Examiners shall
recommend to the Interim Finance Committee, or the Senate
Standing Committee on Finance and the Assembly Standing
Committee on Ways and Means when the Legislature is in general
session, that the expenditure be approved. Upon approval of the
appropriate committee or committees, the money may be so
expended.
4. If any money in the Fund is used as described in paragraph
(d) of subsection 1, the Director shall repay the amount used as soon
as sufficient money is available in the Fund for Prison Industries.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
5. The interest and income earned on the money in the Fund,
after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the
Fund.
6. As used in this section, “Fund” means Fund for New
Construction of Facilities for Prison Industries.
Sec. 24. NRS 209.461 is hereby amended to read as follows:
209.461 1. The Director shall:
(a) To the greatest extent possible, approximate the normal
conditions of training and employment in the community.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, to the extent
practicable, require each offender, except those whose behavior is
found by the Director to preclude participation, to spend 40 hours
each week in vocational training or employment, unless excused for
a medical reason or to attend educational classes in accordance with
NRS 209.396. The Director shall require as a condition of
employment that an offender sign an authorization for the
deductions from his or her wages made pursuant to NRS 209.463.
Authorization to make the deductions pursuant to NRS 209.463 is
implied from the employment of an offender and a signed
authorization from the offender is not required for the Director to
make the deductions pursuant to NRS 209.463.
(c) Use the earnings from services and manufacturing conducted
by the institutions and the money paid by private employers who
employ the offenders to offset the costs of operating the prison
system and to provide wages for the offenders being trained or
employed.
(d) Provide equipment, space and management for services and
manufacturing by offenders.
(e) Employ craftsmen and other personnel to supervise and
instruct offenders.
(f) Contract with governmental agencies and private employers
for the employment of offenders, including their employment on
public works projects under contracts with the State and with local
governments.
(g) Contract for the use of offenders’ services and for the sale of
goods manufactured by offenders.
(h) On or before January 1, 2014, and every 5 years thereafter,
submit a report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
distribution to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on the
Judiciary. The report must include, without limitation, an analysis of
existing contracts with private employers for the employment of
offenders and the potential impact of those contracts on private
industry in this State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
(i) Submit a report to each meeting of the Interim Finance
Committee identifying any accounts receivable related to a program
for the employment of offenders.
2. Every program for the employment of offenders established
by the Director must:
(a) Employ the maximum number of offenders possible;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 209.192, provide for
the use of money produced by the program to reduce the cost of
maintaining the offenders in the institutions;
(c) Have an insignificant effect on the number of jobs available
to the residents of this State; and
(d) Provide occupational training for offenders.
3. An offender may not engage in vocational training,
employment or a business that requires or permits the offender to:
(a) Telemarket or conduct opinion polls by telephone; or
(b) Acquire, review, use or have control over or access to
personal information concerning any person who is not incarcerated.
4. Each fiscal year, the cumulative profits and losses, if any, of
the programs for the employment of offenders established by the
Director must result in a profit for the Department. The following
must not be included in determining whether there is a profit for the
Department:
(a) Fees credited to the Fund for Prison Industries pursuant to
NRS 482.268, any revenue collected by the Department for the
leasing of space, facilities or equipment within the institutions or
facilities of the Department, and any interest or income earned on
the money in the Fund for Prison Industries.
(b) The selling expenses of the Central Administrative Office of
the programs for the employment of offenders. As used in this
paragraph, “selling expenses” means delivery expenses, salaries of
sales personnel and related payroll taxes and costs, the costs of
advertising and the costs of display models.
(c) The general and administrative expenses of the Central
Administrative Office of the programs for the employment of
offenders. As used in this paragraph, “general and administrative
expenses” means the salary of the Deputy Director of Industrial
Programs and the salaries of any other personnel of the Central
Administrative Office and related payroll taxes and costs, the costs
of telephone usage, and the costs of office supplies used and postage
used.
5. If any state-sponsored program incurs a net loss for 2
consecutive fiscal years, the Director shall appear before the [Joint
Interim Standing Committee on the Judiciary] Interim Finance
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
Committee to explain the reasons for the net loss and provide a plan
for the generation of a profit in the next fiscal year. If the program
does not generate a profit in the third fiscal year, the Director shall
take appropriate steps to resolve the issue.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the Director
may, with the approval of the Board:
(a) Lease spaces and facilities within any institution of the
Department to private employers to be used for the vocational
training and employment of offenders.
(b) Grant to reliable offenders the privilege of leaving
institutions or facilities of the Department at certain times for the
purpose of vocational training or employment.
7. Before entering into any contract with a private employer for
the employment of offenders pursuant to subsection 1, the Director
shall obtain from the private employer:
(a) A personal guarantee to secure an amount fixed by the
Director of:
(1) For a contract that does not relate to construction, not less
than 25 percent of the prorated annual amount of the contract but
not more than 100 percent of the prorated annual amount of the
contract, a surety bond made payable to the State of Nevada in an
amount fixed by the Director of not less than 25 percent of the
prorated annual amount of the contract but not more than 100
percent of the prorated annual amount of the contract and
conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract in
accordance with the terms and conditions of the contract; or
(2) For a contract that relates to construction, not less than
100 percent of the prorated annual amount of the contract, a surety
bond made payable to the State of Nevada in an amount fixed by the
Director of not less than 100 percent of the prorated annual amount
of the contract and conditioned upon the faithful performance of the
contract in accordance with the terms and conditions of the contract,
 or a security agreement to secure any debt, obligation or other
liability of the private employer under the contract, including,
without limitation, lease payments, wages earned by offenders and
compensation earned by personnel of the Department. The Director
shall appear before the [Joint Interim Standing Committee on the
Judiciary] Interim Finance Committee to explain the reasons for
the amount fixed by the Director for any personal guarantee or
surety bond.
(b) A detailed written analysis on the estimated impact of the
contract on private industry in this State. The written analysis must
include, without limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
(1) The number of private companies in this State currently
providing the types of products and services offered in the proposed
contract.
(2) The number of residents of this State currently employed
by such private companies.
(3) The number of offenders that would be employed under
the contract.
(4) The skills that the offenders would acquire under the
contract.
8. The provisions of this chapter do not create a right on behalf
of the offender to employment or to receive the federal or state
minimum wage for any employment and do not establish a basis for
any cause of action against the State or its officers or employees for
employment of an offender or for payment of the federal or state
minimum wage to an offender.
9. As used in this section, “state-sponsored program” means a
program for the vocational training or employment of offenders
which does not include a contract of employment with a private
employer.
Sec. 25. NRS 209.4818 is hereby amended to read as follows:
209.4818 1. The [Joint Interim Standing Committee on the
Judiciary] Interim Finance Committee shall:
(a) Be informed on issues and developments relating to
industrial programs for correctional institutions;
(b) [Submit a semiannual report to the Interim Finance
Committee before July 1 and December 1 of each year on the status
of current and proposed industrial programs for correctional
institutions;
(c)] Report to the Legislature on any [other] matter relating to
industrial programs for correctional institutions that it deems
appropriate;
[(d)] (c) Recommend three persons to the Director for
appointment as the Deputy Director for Industrial Programs
whenever a vacancy exists;
[(e)] (d) Before any new industrial program is established by
the Director, review the proposed program for compliance with the
requirements of subsections 2, 3, 4 and 7 of NRS 209.461 and
submit to the Director its recommendations concerning the proposed
program; and
[(f)] (e) Review each state-sponsored industry program
established pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 209.461 to determine
whether the program is operating profitably. If the Committee
determines that a program has incurred a net loss in 3 consecutive
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
fiscal years, the Committee shall report its finding to the Director
with a recommendation regarding whether the program should be
continued or terminated. If the Director does not accept the
recommendation of the Committee, the Director shall submit a
written report to the Committee setting forth his or her reasons for
rejecting the recommendation.
2. Upon the request of the [Joint Interim Standing Committee
on the Judiciary,] Interim Finance Committee, the Director and the
Deputy Director for Industrial Programs shall provide to the
Committee any information that the Committee determines is
relevant to the performance of the duties of the Committee.
3. As used in this section, “state-sponsored industry program”
means a program for the vocational training or employment of
offenders which does not include a contract of employment with a
private employer.
Sec. 26. Chapter 232B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
As used in this section and NRS 232B.210 to 232B.240,
inclusive, unless the context otherwise requires, “Sunset
Committee” or “Committee” means the Sunset Committee of the
Legislature created by NRS 232B.210.
Sec. 27. NRS 232B.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232B.210 1. The Sunset [Subcommittee of the Legislative
Commission, consisting of nine members,] Committee of the
Legislature is hereby created.
2. The [membership of the Sunset Subcommittee] Committee
consists of [:
(a) Three voting members of the Legislature appointed by the
Majority Leader of the Senate, at least one of whom must be a
member of the minority political party;
(b) Three voting members of the Legislature appointed by the
Speaker of the Assembly, at least one of whom must be a member
of the minority political party; and
(c) Three nonvoting members of the general public appointed by
the Chair of the Legislative Commission from among the names of
nominees submitted by the Governor pursuant to subsection 2.
2. The Governor shall, at least 30 days before the beginning of
the term of any member appointed pursuant to paragraph (c) of
subsection 1, or within 30 days after such a position on the Sunset
Subcommittee becomes vacant, submit to the Legislative
Commission the names of at least three persons qualified for
membership on the Sunset Subcommittee. The Chair of the
Legislative Commission shall appoint a new member or fill the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
vacancy from the list, or request a new list. The Chair of
the Legislative Commission may appoint any qualified person who
is a resident of this State to a position described in paragraph (c) of
subsection 1.
3. Each member of the Sunset Subcommittee serves at the
pleasure of the appointing authority.
4. The voting members of the Sunset Subcommittee shall elect
a Chair from one House of the Legislature and a Vice Chair from
the other House. Each Chair and Vice Chair holds office for a term
of 2 years commencing on July 1 of each odd-numbered year. If a
vacancy occurs in the office of Chair or Vice Chair, the vacancy
must be filled in the same manner as the original selection for the
remainder of the unexpired term.
5. The membership of any member of the Sunset
Subcommittee who is a Legislator and who is not a candidate for
reelection or who is defeated for reelection terminates on the day
next after the general election.
6. A vacancy on the Sunset Subcommittee must be filled in the
same manner as the original appointment.
7. The Sunset Subcommittee shall meet at the times and places
specified by a call of the Chair. Four voting members of the Sunset
Subcommittee constitute a quorum, and a quorum may exercise any
power or authority conferred on the Sunset Subcommittee.
8. For each day or portion of a day during which a member of
the Sunset Subcommittee who is a Legislator attends a meeting of
the Sunset Subcommittee or is otherwise engaged in the business
of the Sunset Subcommittee, except during a regular or special
session of the Legislature, the Legislator is entitled to receive the:
(a) Compensation provided for a majority of the members of the
Legislature during the first 60 days of the preceding regular session;
(b) Per diem allowance provided for state officers generally; and
(c) Travel expenses provided pursuant to NRS 218A.655.
 The compensation, per diem allowances and travel expenses of
the members of the Sunset Subcommittee who are Legislators must
be paid from the Legislative Fund.
9. While engaged in the business of the Sunset Subcommittee,
the members of the Subcommittee who are not Legislators are
entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel expenses
provided for state officers and employees generally.] eight regular
members and five alternate members who are appointed in the
same manner as the members of a Joint Interim Standing
Committee pursuant to NRS 218E.320.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions
of NRS 218E.320, 218E.325 and 218E.330:
(a) Apply to the Committee in the same manner as a Joint
Interim Standing Committee, including, without limitation,
providing the Committee with any powers, privileges and
immunities set forth in those provisions; and
(b) Control the Committee’s formation, organization and
operations, including, without limitation, its membership, officers,
management, government, budget, compensation, allowances,
expenses, meetings and proceedings, but the Committee shall not
be deemed a Joint Interim Standing Committee for the purposes of
the number of requests that it may submit for the drafting of
legislative measures pursuant to NRS 218D.160.
4. If there is a conflict between the provisions of NRS
218E.320, 218E.325 and 218E.330 and the provisions of a specific
statute that applies to the Committee, the provisions of the specific
statute control.
Sec. 28. NRS 232B.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232B.220 1. The Sunset [Subcommittee of the Legislative
Commission] Committee shall conduct a review of each board and
commission in this State which is not provided for in the Nevada
Constitution or established by an executive order of the Governor to
determine whether the board or commission should be terminated,
modified, consolidated with another board or commission or
continued. Such a review must include, without limitation:
(a) An evaluation of the major policies and programs of the
board or commission, including, without limitation, an examination
of other programs or services offered in this State to determine if
any other provided programs or services duplicate those offered by
the board or commission;
(b) Any recommendations for improvements in the policies and
programs offered by the board or commission; and
(c) A determination of whether any statutory tax exemptions,
abatements or money set aside to be provided to the board or
commission should be terminated, modified or continued.
2. The [Sunset Subcommittee] Committee shall review not less
than 10 boards and commissions specified in subsection 1 during
each legislative interim.
3. Any action taken by the [Sunset Subcommittee] Committee
concerning a board or commission pursuant to NRS 232B.210 to
[232B.250,] 232B.240, inclusive, and section 26 of this act is in
addition or supplemental to any action taken by the Legislative
Commission pursuant to NRS 232B.010 to 232B.100, inclusive.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 33 –
Sec. 29. NRS 232B.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232B.230 1. Each board and commission subject to
review by the Sunset [Subcommittee of the Legislative
Commission] Committee shall submit information to the [Sunset
Subcommittee] Committee on a form prescribed by the [Sunset
Subcommittee.] Committee. The information must include, without
limitation:
(a) The name of the board or commission;
(b) The name of each member of the board or commission;
(c) The address of the Internet website established and
maintained by the board or commission, if any;
(d) The name and contact information of the executive director
of the board or commission, if any;
(e) A list of the members of the staff of the board or
commission;
(f) The authority by which the board or commission was
created;
(g) The governing structure of the board or commission,
including, without limitation, information concerning the method,
terms, qualifications and conditions of appointment and removal of
the members of the board or commission;
(h) The duties of the board or commission;
(i) The operating budget of the board or commission;
(j) A statement setting forth the income and expenses of the
board or commission for at least 3 years immediately preceding the
date on which the board or commission submits the form required
by this subsection, including the balances of any fund or account
maintained by or on behalf of the board or commission;
(k) The most recent audit conducted of the board or
commission, if any;
(l) The dates of the immediately preceding six meetings held by
the board or commission;
(m) A statement of the objectives and programs of the board or
commission;
(n) A conclusion concerning the effectiveness of the objectives
and programs of the board or commission;
(o) Any recommendations for statutory changes which are
necessary for the board or commission to carry out its objectives and
programs; and
(p) Such other information as the [Sunset Subcommittee]
Committee may require.
2. The [Sunset Subcommittee] Committee may direct the
Legislative Counsel Bureau to assist in its research, investigations,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 34 –
review and analysis of the information submitted by each board and
commission pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 30. NRS 232B.235 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232B.235 1. At any time during a legislative interim, if the
Sunset [Subcommittee of the Legislative Commission] Committee
determines that a board or commission subject to its review [by the
Sunset Subcommittee] should be audited, the [Sunset
Subcommittee] Committee shall make such a recommendation to
the Legislative Commission. The [Sunset Subcommittee]
Committee shall include with its recommendation a summary of the
justification for the recommendation.
2. After receiving a recommendation from the [Sunset
Subcommittee] Committee pursuant to subsection 1, the Legislative
Commission shall evaluate the recommendation and determine
whether to direct the Legislative Auditor to perform an audit of the
board or commission pursuant to NRS 218G.120. In making its
determination, the Legislative Commission shall consider the
current workload of the Audit Division of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau.
3. The Legislative Auditor shall not perform more than four
audits directed by the Legislative Commission pursuant to this
section during a legislative interim.
Sec. 31. NRS 232B.237 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232B.237 1. The Sunset [Subcommittee of the Legislative
Commission] Committee shall conduct a review of each
professional or occupational licensing board and regulatory body in
this State to determine whether the restrictions on the criminal
history of an applicant for an occupational or professional license
are appropriate.
2. Each professional or occupational licensing board and
regulatory body subject to review pursuant to subsection 1 must
submit information to the [Sunset Subcommittee] Committee on a
form prescribed by the [Sunset Subcommittee.] Committee. The
information must include, without limitation:
(a) The number of petitions submitted to a professional or
occupational licensing board and regulatory body pursuant to NRS
1.545, 240A.275, 244.33504, 361.2212, 379.00785, 435.3395,
445B.7776, 449.03008, 449.4316, 450B.169, 455C.125, 457.1825,
458.0258, 477.2233, 482.163, 487.006, 489.298, 490.195, 502.375,
503.5831, 504.391, 505.013, 534.1405, 544.147, 555.305, 557.225,
576.037, 581.1033, 582.035, 584.2165, 587.014, 599A.057,
599B.127, 618.357, 622.085, 678B.630 and 706.4626;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 35 –
(b) The number of determinations of disqualification made by
the professional or occupational licensing board and regulatory body
pursuant to NRS 1.545, 240A.275, 244.33504, 361.2212,
379.00785, 435.3395, 445B.7776, 449.03008, 449.4316, 450B.169,
455C.125, 457.1825, 458.0258, 477.2233, 482.163, 487.006,
489.298, 490.195, 502.375, 503.5831, 504.391, 505.013, 534.1405,
544.147, 555.305, 557.225, 576.037, 581.1033, 582.035, 584.2165,
587.014, 599A.057, 599B.127, 618.357, 622.085, 678B.630 and
706.4626; and
(c) The reasons for such determinations of disqualification.
3. As used in this section, “regulatory body” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 622.060.
Sec. 32. NRS 232B.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232B.240 1. The Sunset [Subcommittee of the Legislative
Commission] Committee shall conduct public hearings for the
purpose of obtaining comments on, and may require the Legislative
Counsel Bureau to submit reports on, the need for the termination,
modification, consolidation or continued operation of a board or
commission.
2. The [Sunset Subcommittee] Committee shall consider any
report submitted to it by the Legislative Counsel Bureau.
3. The Committee may exercise any of the investigative
powers set forth in NRS 218E.105 to 218E.140, inclusive.
4. A board or commission has the burden of proving that there
is a public need for its continued existence.
Sec. 33. NRS 233B.063 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.063 1. An agency that intends to adopt, amend or
repeal a permanent regulation must deliver to the Legislative
Counsel a copy of the proposed regulation. The Legislative Counsel
shall examine and if appropriate revise the language submitted so
that it is clear, concise and suitable for incorporation in the Nevada
Administrative Code, but shall not alter the meaning or effect
without the consent of the agency.
2. Unless the proposed regulation is submitted to the
Legislative Counsel between July 1 of an even-numbered year and
July 1 of the succeeding odd-numbered year, the Legislative
Counsel shall deliver the approved or revised text of the regulation
within 30 days after it is submitted to the Legislative Counsel. If the
proposed or revised text of a regulation is changed before adoption,
the agency shall submit the changed text to the Legislative Counsel,
who shall examine and revise it if appropriate pursuant to the
standards of subsection 1. Unless it is submitted between July 1 of
an even-numbered year and July 1 of the succeeding odd-numbered
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 36 –
year, the Legislative Counsel shall return it with any appropriate
revisions within 30 days. [If the agency is a licensing board as
defined in NRS 439B.225 and the proposed regulation relates to
standards for the issuance or renewal of licenses, permits or
certificates of registration issued to a person or facility regulated by
the agency, the Legislative Counsel shall also deliver one copy of
the approved or revised text of the regulation to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services.]
3. An agency may adopt a temporary regulation between
August 1 of an even-numbered year and July 1 of the succeeding
odd-numbered year without following the procedure required by this
section and NRS 233B.064, but any such regulation expires by
limitation on November 1 of the odd-numbered year. A
substantively identical permanent regulation may be subsequently
adopted.
4. An agency may amend or suspend a permanent regulation
between August 1 of an even-numbered year and July 1 of the
succeeding odd-numbered year by adopting a temporary regulation
in the same manner and subject to the same provisions as prescribed
in subsection 3.
Sec. 34. NRS 233B.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.070 1. A permanent regulation becomes effective when
the Legislative Counsel files with the Secretary of State the original
of the final draft or revision of a regulation, except as otherwise
provided in NRS 293.247 or where a later date is specified in the
regulation.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 233B.0633, an agency
that has adopted a temporary regulation may not file the temporary
regulation with the Secretary of State until 35 days after the date on
which the temporary regulation was adopted by the agency. A
temporary regulation becomes effective when the agency files with
the Secretary of State the original of the final draft or revision of the
regulation, together with the informational statement prepared
pursuant to NRS 233B.066. The agency shall also file a copy of the
temporary regulation with the Legislative Counsel, together with the
informational statement prepared pursuant to NRS 233B.066.
3. An emergency regulation becomes effective when the
agency files with the Secretary of State the original of the final draft
or revision of an emergency regulation, together with the
informational statement prepared pursuant to NRS 233B.066. The
agency shall also file a copy of the emergency regulation with the
Legislative Counsel, together with the informational statement
prepared pursuant to NRS 233B.066.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 37 –
4. The Secretary of State shall maintain the original of the final
draft or revision of each regulation in a permanent file to be used
only for the preparation of official copies.
5. The Secretary of State shall file, with the original of each
agency’s rules of practice, the current statement of the agency
concerning the date and results of its most recent review of those
rules.
6. Immediately after each permanent or temporary regulation is
filed, the agency shall deliver one copy of the final draft or revision,
bearing the stamp of the Secretary of State indicating that it has
been filed, including material adopted by reference which is not
already filed with the State Library, Archives and Public Records
Administrator, to the State Library, Archives and Public Records
Administrator for use by the public. [If the agency is a licensing
board as defined in NRS 439B.225 and it has adopted a permanent
regulation relating to standards for the issuance or renewal of
licenses, permits or certificates of registration issued to a person or
facility regulated by the agency, the agency shall also deliver one
copy of the regulation, bearing the stamp of the Secretary of State,
to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and Human
Services within 10 days after the regulation is filed with the
Secretary of State.]
7. Each agency shall furnish a copy of all or part of that part of
the Nevada Administrative Code which contains its regulations, to
any person who requests a copy, and may charge a reasonable fee
for the copy based on the cost of reproduction if it does not have
money appropriated or authorized for that purpose.
8. An agency which publishes any regulations included in the
Nevada Administrative Code shall use the exact text of the
regulation as it appears in the Nevada Administrative Code,
including the leadlines and numbers of the sections. Any other
material which an agency includes in a publication with its
regulations must be presented in a form which clearly distinguishes
that material from the regulations.
Sec. 35. NRS 321.7355 is hereby amended to read as follows:
321.7355 1. The State Land Use Planning Agency may
prepare, in cooperation with appropriate federal and state agencies
and local governments throughout the State, plans or statements of
policy concerning the administration of lands in the State of Nevada
that are under federal management. The plans or statements of
policy must not include matters concerning zoning or the division of
land and must be consistent with local plans and regulations
concerning the use of private property.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 38 –
2. The State Land Use Planning Agency shall:
(a) Encourage public comment upon the various matters treated
in a proposed plan or statement of policy throughout its preparation
and incorporate such comments into the proposed plan or statement
of policy as are appropriate;
(b) Submit its work on a plan or statement of policy periodically
for review and comment by the Land Use Planning Advisory
Council and the [Subcommittee] Committee on Public Lands ; [of
the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Natural Resources;] and
(c) Provide written responses to written comments received
from a county or city upon the various matters treated in a proposed
plan or statement of policy.
3. Whenever the State Land Use Planning Agency prepares
plans or statements of policy pursuant to subsection 1 and submits
those plans or statements of policy to the Governor, the Legislature,
the [Subcommittee] Committee on Public Lands [of the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Natural Resources] or an agency of
the Federal Government, the State Land Use Planning Agency shall
include with each plan or statement of policy the comments and
recommendations of:
(a) The Land Use Planning Advisory Council; and
(b) The [Subcommittee] Committee on Public Lands . [of the
Joint Interim Standing Committee on Natural Resources.]
4. A plan or statement of policy must be approved by the
governing bodies of the county and cities affected by it before it is
put into effect.
Sec. 36. NRS 332.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
332.215 1. Each county of this state whose population is
100,000 or more, must be a member of the Commission to Study
Governmental Purchasing which is composed of all purchasing
agents of the local governments within those counties. Each county
whose population is less than 100,000 may participate as a voting
member of the Commission. The members shall select a Chair from
among their number.
2. The Commission shall meet no less than quarterly or at the
call of the Chair to study practices in governmental purchasing and
laws relating thereto and shall make recommendations with respect
to those laws to the next regular session of the Legislature.
3. On or before July 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Commission shall submit a written report to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on [Legislative Operations and Elections]
Government Affairs that includes any recommendations of the
Commission for legislation relating to governmental purchasing.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 39 –
Sec. 37. NRS 388.887 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.887 1. The State Board shall create a subcommittee to
review and make recommendations on the manner in which to
provide age-appropriate and historically accurate instruction about
the Holocaust and other genocides, such as the Armenian,
Cambodian, Darfur, Guatemalan and Rwandan genocides, in social
studies and language arts courses of study.
2. The review conducted and any recommendations made by
the subcommittee pursuant to this section must include, without
limitation:
(a) The manner in which to modify the curricula of relevant
courses in social studies and language arts to include the instruction
described in this section;
(b) An inventory of available classroom resources for educators
to meet the requirements of this section;
(c) The professional development that may be necessary or
appropriate for a teacher who provides the instruction described in
this section; and
(d) Consideration of any similar instruction provided in another
state or school district.
3. The subcommittee shall link current standards with
community resources that may assist in the implementation of the
instruction described in subsection 1. The subcommittee shall
review the manner in which the current standards support
comprehensive education regarding the Holocaust and other
genocides, such as the Armenian, Cambodian, Darfur, Guatemalan
and Rwandan genocides, including, without limitation, by:
(a) Preparing pupils to confront the immorality of the Holocaust,
other genocides, such as the Armenian, Cambodian, Darfur,
Guatemalan and Rwandan genocides, and other acts of mass
violence and to reflect on the causes of related historical events;
(b) Addressing the breadth of the history of the Holocaust,
including, without limitation, the dictatorship of the Third Reich, the
system of concentration camps, the persecution of both Jewish and
non-Jewish people, the resistance to the Third Reich and the
Holocaust by both Jewish and non-Jewish people and the various
trials that occurred after the end of World War II;
(c) Developing the respect of pupils for cultural diversity and
helping pupils to gain insight into the importance of international
human rights for all people;
(d) Promoting the understanding of pupils of how the Holocaust
contributed to the need for the term “genocide” and led to
international legislation that recognized genocide as a crime;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 40 –
(e) Communicating the impact of personal responsibility, civic
engagement and societal responsiveness;
(f) Stimulating the reflection of pupils on the role and
responsibility of citizens in democratic societies to combat
misinformation, indifference and discrimination through the
development of critical thinking skills and through tools of
resistance such as protest, reform and celebration;
(g) Providing pupils with opportunities to contextualize and
analyze patterns of human behavior by persons and groups who
belong in one or more categories, including, without limitation,
perpetrator, collaborator, bystander, victim and rescuer;
(h) Enabling pupils to understand the ramifications of prejudice,
racism and stereotyping;
(i) Preserving the memories of survivors of genocide and
providing opportunities for pupils to discuss and honor the cultural
legacies of survivors;
(j) Providing pupils with a foundation for examining the history
of discrimination in this State;
(k) Including in curricula the use of personal narratives and
multimedia primary source materials, which may include, without
limitation, video testimony, photographs, artwork, diary entries,
letters, government documents, maps and poems; and
(l) Exploring the various mechanisms of transitional and
restorative justice that help humanity move forward in the aftermath
of genocide.
4. The subcommittee must be composed of the Superintendent
of Public Instruction, or his or her designee, and the following
members appointed by the Superintendent:
(a) Three members representing the Governor’s Advisory
Council on Education Relating to the Holocaust created by
NRS 233G.020;
(b) Three members representing nonprofit organizations that
have developed curricula regarding the Holocaust for use in public
schools;
(c) At least one member representing a school district in which
60,000 or more pupils are enrolled;
(d) At least one member representing a school district in which
fewer than 60,000 pupils are enrolled;
(e) At least one member representing a charter school located in
this State;
(f) At least one member representing nonprofit organizations
that have developed curricula for use in public schools regarding the
Armenian genocide; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 41 –
(g) At least one member representing nonprofit organizations
that have developed curricula for use in public schools regarding
genocides other than the Holocaust and the Armenian genocide.
5. On or before [October] July 1 of each even-numbered year,
the State Board shall report its findings and any recommendations to
the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education, including,
without limitation, any recommendations made by the subcommittee
pursuant to subsection 1, as well as any actions the State Board has
taken or intends to take to include the instruction in the relevant
courses pursuant to subsection 2.
6. On or before [February 1] August 31 of each [odd-
numbered] even-numbered year, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education shall consider the report submitted by the
State Board and prepare and submit a written report to the Director
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature
concerning the Committee’s consideration of the matters described
in this section and any recommendations for legislation to ensure the
instruction described in this section is included in the curricula for
the relevant courses.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Genocide” means any of the following acts committed with
intent to destroy, in whole or in part, a national, ethnic, racial or
religious group and includes, without limitation, genocides and
other acts of mass atrocities identified by the United States
Holocaust Memorial Museum:
(1) Killing members of the group;
(2) Causing serious bodily or mental harm to members of the
group;
(3) Deliberately inflicting on the group conditions of life
calculated to bring about its physical destruction in whole or in part;
(4) Imposing measures intended to prevent births within the
group; and
(5) Forcibly transferring children of the group to another
group.
(b) “Holocaust” means the systematic, bureaucratic, state-
sponsored persecution and murder of approximately 6,000,000
Jewish persons and 5,000,000 other persons by the Nazi regime and
its collaborators.
Sec. 38. NRS 391.494 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.494 1. Each member of the Task Force must:
(a) Be a licensed teacher or an education support professional
with at least 5 consecutive years of experience teaching or serving
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 42 –
as an education support professional, as applicable, in a public
school in this State;
(b) Be currently employed as a teacher or an education support
professional and actively teaching or serving as an education
support professional, as applicable, in a public school in this State,
and remain employed as a teacher or an education support
professional, as applicable, in a public school in this State for the
duration of the member’s term; and
(c) Not be currently serving on any other education-related
board, commission, council, task force or similar governmental
entity.
2. On or before December 1, 2023, the Department shall
prescribe a uniform application for a teacher or an education support
professional to use to apply to serve on the Task Force.
3. A teacher or an education support professional who wishes
to serve on the Task Force must submit an application prescribed
pursuant to subsection 2 to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Education on or before [January 15] December 1 of an [even-
numbered] odd-numbered year. On or before February 15 of each
even-numbered year, the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
Education shall select one or more teachers or education support
professionals, as applicable, to serve as a member of the Task Force.
Sec. 39. NRS 449.242 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.242 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4,
each hospital located in a county whose population is 100,000 or
more and which is licensed to have more than 70 beds shall
establish a staffing committee to develop a written policy as
required pursuant to NRS 449.2423 and a documented staffing plan
as required pursuant to NRS 449.2421. Each staffing committee
established pursuant to this subsection must consist of:
(a) Not less than one-half of the total regular members of the
staffing committee from the licensed nursing staff and certified
nursing assistants who are providing direct patient care at the
hospital. The members described in this paragraph must consist of:
(1) One member representing each unit of the hospital who is
a licensed nurse who provides direct patient care on that unit,
elected by the licensed nursing staff who provide direct patient care
on the unit that the member will represent.
(2) One member representing each unit of the hospital who is
a certified nursing assistant who provides direct patient care on that
unit, elected by the certified nursing assistants who provide direct
patient care on the unit that the member will represent.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 43 –
(b) Not less than one-half of the total regular members of the
staffing committee appointed by the administration of the hospital.
(c) One alternate member representing each unit of the hospital
who is a licensed nurse or certified nursing assistant who provides
direct patient care on that unit, elected by the licensed nursing staff
and certified nursing assistants who provide direct patient care on
the unit that the member represents.
2. Each time a new staffing committee is formed pursuant to
subsection 1, the administration of the hospital shall hold an election
to select the members described in paragraphs (a) and (c) of
subsection 1. Each licensed nurse and certified staffing assistant
who provides direct patient care at the hospital must be allowed at
least 3 days to vote for:
(a) The regular member described in paragraph (a) of subsection
1 who will represent his or her unit and profession; and
(b) The alternate member described in paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 who will represent his or her unit.
3. If a vacancy occurs in a position on a staffing committee
described in paragraph (a) or (c) of subsection 1, a new regular or
alternate member, as applicable, must be elected in the same manner
as his or her predecessor.
4. If a staffing committee is established for a health care
facility described in subsection 1 through collective bargaining with
an employee organization representing the licensed nursing staff and
certified nursing assistants of the health care facility:
(a) The health care facility is not required to form a staffing
committee pursuant to that subsection; and
(b) The staffing committee established pursuant to the collective
bargaining agreement shall be deemed to be the staffing committee
established for the health care facility pursuant to subsection 1.
5. In developing the written policy and the staffing plan, the
staffing committee shall consider, without limitation, the
information received pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 5 of
NRS 449.2423 regarding requests to be relieved of a work
assignment, refusals of a work assignment and objections to a work
assignment.
6. The staffing committee of a hospital shall meet at least
quarterly.
[7. Each hospital that is required to establish a staffing
committee pursuant to this section shall prepare a written report
concerning the establishment of the staffing committee, the
activities and progress of the staffing committee and a determination
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 44 –
of the efficacy of the staffing committee. The hospital shall submit
the report on or before December 31 of each:
(a) Even-numbered year to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmission to the next regular session of the
Legislature.
(b) Odd-numbered year to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Health and Human Services.]
Sec. 40. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 40.5. NRS 514A.110 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
514A.110 [A]
1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a permanent
regulation adopted by the:
[1.] (a) Nevada Tax Commission, pursuant to NRS 360.090,
concerning any taxation related to the extraction of any mineral in
this State, including, without limitation, the taxation of the net
proceeds pursuant to chapter 362 of NRS and Section 5 of Article
10 of the Nevada Constitution;
[2.] (b) Administrator of the Division of Industrial Relations of
the Department of Business and Industry for mine health and safety
pursuant to NRS 512.131;
[3.] (c) Commission on Mineral Resources pursuant to NRS
513.063, 513.094 or 519A.290; and
[4.] (d) State Environmental Commission pursuant to
NRS 519A.160,
 is not effective unless it is reviewed by the Mining Oversight and
Accountability Commission before it is approved pursuant to
chapter 233B of NRS by the Legislative Commission or the
Subcommittee to Review Regulations appointed pursuant to
subsection 6 of NRS 233B.067. After conducting its review of the
regulation, the Mining Oversight and Accountability Commission
shall provide a report of its findings and recommendations regarding
the regulation to the Legislative Counsel for submission to the
Legislative Commission or the Subcommittee to Review
Regulations, as appropriate.
2. If the Mining Oversight and Accountability Commission
fails to review a permanent regulation described in subsection 1
within 90 days after the date on which the regulation was adopted,
the regulation may be approved without such a review pursuant to
chapter 233B of NRS by the Legislative Commission or the
Subcommittee to Review Regulations appointed pursuant to
subsection 6 of NRS 233B.067 and becomes effective in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 233B.070.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 45 –
Sec. 41. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 42. 1. If the provisions of any other statute or any other
act or resolution passed by the Legislature conflict with the
provisions of this act because they assign a power, duty or
legislative study or investigation to a legislative committee,
subcommittee or other body abolished by the provisions of this act
or because they require the submission of a report, document or
other information to a legislative committee, subcommittee or other
body abolished by the provisions of this act:
(a) The conflicting provisions of the other statute, act or
resolution are superseded and abrogated by the provisions of this
act; and
(b) The power, duty or legislative study or investigation shall be
deemed assigned to, or the report, document or other information
shall be deemed required to be submitted to, the appropriate Joint
Interim Standing Committee created by NRS 218E.320 which has
jurisdiction over the subject matter, except that if the subject matter
falls within the jurisdiction of more than one Joint Interim Standing
Committee, the Legislative Commission shall decide and resolve the
matter in a manner that is consistent with the intent of the
Legislature as determined by the Legislative Commission.
2. The Legislative Counsel shall, in preparing the reprint and
supplements to the Nevada Revised Statutes and supplements to the
Nevada Administrative Code:
(a) Make any revisions that are necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section; and
(b) Change any references to a legislative committee,
subcommittee or other body which has been abolished by the
provisions of this act, or whose name has been changed or whose
responsibilities have been transferred by the provisions of this act,
so that such references refer to the appropriate legislative
committee, subcommittee or other body.
3. As used in this section, “legislative study or investigation”
includes, without limitation:
(a) Any interim legislative study or investigation; or
(b) Any legislative study or investigation assigned to a statutory
legislative committee, subcommittee or other body.
Sec. 43. NRS 218E.560, 218E.755, 232B.250 and 439B.225
are hereby repealed.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 46 –
Sec. 44. 1. This section and sections 1 to 21, inclusive, and
23 to 43, inclusive, of this act become effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 22 of this act becomes effective on the date that the
Director of the Department of Public Safety determines that there is
sufficient funding to carry out the provisions of NRS 193.309.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)